Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,220
State Claims Board; members; legal advisor; hire secretary; expenses.

The Director of Insurance, Commissioner of Labor, and Director of Administrative Services shall constitute the State Claims Board which shall be a part of the Risk Management Program created by section 81-8,239.01. The Attorney General shall be its legal advisor. With the advice and consent of the other members of the board, the Director of Administrative Services may hire a secretary for the board. The members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services except that provided by law for the offices they hold, but they shall be allowed necessary traveling expenses in performing their duties as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1943, c. 129, § 1, p. 432;

R.S.1943, § 81-857;

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 12, p. 2849;

Laws 1972, LB 1334, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 185;

Laws 1981, LB 273, § 18;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 31;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB821, § 5.

Other provisions for claims against state, see sections 81-8,294 to 81-8,306 and 81-1170.01 to 81-1170.05.

Presentment of warrants issued more than two years, see section 77-2205.